Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2745.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 41-1153, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1153. Disobedience of subpoena as legislative contempt A. If a witness neglects or refuses to obey a legislative subpoena, or, appearing, neglects or refuses to testify, the senate or the house may, by resolution entered in the journal, commit him unless another procedure is provided by the rules of either house of the legislature, the witness may be committed for contempt by either of the following: 1. After the witness is given notice and an OPPORTUNITY for a hearing to present evidence, at the discretion of the chairperson, to show cause as to why the witness is not in contempt, an order of contempt by any committee chairperson or the president of the senate or speaker of the house of representatives that finds that the witness Had knowledge of the SUBPOENA, Had the ability to comply with the SUBPOENA and failed to comply with the subpoena. 2. A resolution entered in the journal by the senate or the house of representatives. B. A witness neglecting who NEGLECTs or refusing refuses to attend in obedience to a subpoena may be arrested by the sergeant-at-arms or a county sheriff and brought before the senate or house upon of REPRESENTATIVES on authority of either of the following: 1. A copy of the order of contempt that is signed by the chairperson or the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives and that is countersigned by the secretary of the senate or chief clerk of the house of representatives. 2. a copy of the resolution that is signed by the president of the senate or speaker of the house of representatives,  and that is countersigned by the secretary of the senate or chief clerk of the house of representatives. END_STATUTE